Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [626.893] IMMIGRATION AGREEMENTS PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, "immigration enforcement agreement" means a contract, an agreement, an intergovernmental service agreement, or a memorandum of understanding with the federal government that authorizes the state, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or any agency, officer, employee, or agent of the state or a unit of local government to enforce civil immigration law. Immigration enforcement agreement includes an agreement made in accordance with United States Code, title 8, section 1103; United States Code, title 8, section 1357; or any other federal law. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin The state, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or any agency, officer, employee, or agent of the state or a unit of local government may not enter into an immigration enforcement agreement. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Termination of existing agreements. new text end new text begin The state, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or any agency, officer, employee, or agent of the state or a unit of local government with an existing immigration enforcement agreement must exercise the termination provision contained in the immigration enforcement agreement the day following final enactment of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end